Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB154.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1106, 1107 and 1111 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1106. Examination and Approval of Voting Machines by the Secretary of the Commonwealth.--* * *(g) Examination shall include testing of all software required for the voting machine's operation, the ballot reader, 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 the digital printer, the fail-safe operations, the counting center environmental requirements and the equipment reliability estimate.(h) For the purposes of examining the voting machine, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall employ or contract for the services of at least one individual who is an expert in one or more fields of data processing, mechanical engineering and public administration and shall require from the individual a written report of the individual's examination.(i) Within thirty days after completing the examination and upon approval of any electronic or electromechanical voting machine, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall make and maintain a report on the machine, together with a written or printed description and drawings and photographs clearly identifying the machine and the operation of the machine. As soon as practicable after the filing, the Department of State shall send a notice of certification and upon request a copy of the report to county boards of elections in this Commonwealth. The report under this subsection shall be a public record under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the "Right-to-Know Law."(j) After a voting machine has been approved by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, any change or improvement in the machine must be approved by the Secretary of the Commonwealth prior to the adoption of the change or improvement by a county. If the change or improvement does not comply with the requirements of this act, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall suspend sales of the equipment or machine in this Commonwealth until the equipment or machine complies with the requirements of this act.20250HB0154PN0114 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (k) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall examine and approve all electronic or electromechanical devices used in the casting, processing or tabulation of ballots or in the recording of electors, including ballot sorters, envelope extractors, ballot scanners and electronic pollbooks.(l) The examination and approval under subsection (k) shall ensure that the device conforms with standards to provide timeliness and accuracy in the casting and counting of ballots or in the recording of electors.Section 1107. Requirements of Voting Machines.--No voting machine shall, upon any examination or reexamination, be approved by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, or by any examiner appointed by him, unless it shall, at the time, satisfy the following requirements:* * *(u) It shall immediately reject a ballot where the number of votes for an office or question exceeds the number which the elector is entitled to cast or where the tabulating equipment reads the ballot as a ballot with no votes cast.(v) It shall be capable of providing records from which the operation of the voting machine may be audited.(w) It shall be capable of recording votes from ballots of different political parties from the same precinct, for a primary election.(x) It shall be manufactured in the United States and sold by a vendor with a primary place of business within the United States.(y) It shall utilize open-source software code.(z) It shall fully comply with the Voluntary Voting System Guidelines 2.0 adopted by the United States Election Assistance 20250HB0154PN0114 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commission on February 10, 2021.(z.1) The requirements of subsections (u), (v), (w), (x), (y) and (z) shall apply only to voting machines newly examined or approved by the Secretary of the Commonwealth after 2026. No voting machines purchased by a county prior to 2026 shall be decertified on the basis of noncompliance with subsection (u), (v), (w), (x), (y) or (z).Section 1111. Preparation of Voting Machines by County Election Boards.--* * *(g) On any day not more than thirty-five (35) days before the commencement of voting, the county election board shall have the automatic tabulating equipment publicly tested to ascertain that the equipment will correctly count the votes cast for all offices and on all measures. If the ballots to be used at the polling place on election day are not available at the time of the testing, the county election board may conduct an additional test not more than ten (10) days before election day. Public notice of the time and place of the test shall be given at least forty-eight (48) hours prior to the test by publication on the county election board's publicly accessible Internet website and once in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the county or, if there is no newspaper of general circulation in the county, by posting the notice in at least four conspicuous places in the county. The county election board shall provide written notice to each candidate for election of the time and location of the public preelection test. The test shall be open to representatives of the political parties, the press and the public and shall be video recorded and broadcast simultaneously on a publicly accessible Internet website. Each political party 20250HB0154PN0114 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may designate one person with expertise in the computer field who shall be allowed in the central counting room when tests are being conducted and when the official votes are being counted. The designee may not interfere with the normal operation of the canvassing board.(h) For electronic or electromechanical voting machines configured to tabulate mail-in or absentee ballots at a central or regional site, the public testing shall be conducted by processing a preaudited group of ballots so produced as to record a predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and on each measure and to include one or more ballots for each office which have activated voting positions in excess of the number allowed by law in order to test the ability of the automatic tabulating equipment to reject the votes. If an error is detected, the cause of the error shall be corrected and an errorless count shall be made before the automatic tabulating equipment is approved. The test shall be repeated and errorless results must be achieved immediately before the start of the official count of the ballots and again after the completion of the official count. The programs and ballots used for testing shall be sealed and retained under the custody of the county election board.(i) For electronic or electromechanical voting machines configured to include electronic or electromechanical tabulation devices which are distributed to the precincts, all or a sample of the devices to be used in the election shall be publicly tested. If a sample is to be tested, the sample shall consist of a random selection of at least ten per cent of the devices. The test shall be conducted by processing a group of ballots, causing the device to output results for the ballots processed 20250HB0154PN0114 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and comparing the output of results to the results expected for the ballots processed. The group of ballots shall be produced so as to record a predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and on each measure and to include for each office one or more ballots which have activated voting positions in excess of the number allowed by law in order to test the ability of the tabulating device to reject such votes.(j) If a tested tabulating device is found to have an error in tabulation, it shall be deemed unsatisfactory. For each device deemed unsatisfactory, the county election board shall take steps to determine the cause of the error, shall attempt to identify and test other devices that could reasonably be expected to have the same error and shall test a number of additional devices sufficient to determine that each device is satisfactory. Upon deeming a device unsatisfactory, the county election board may require all devices to be tested or may declare that all devices are unsatisfactory.(k) If the operation or output of any tested tabulation device, such as spelling or the order of candidates on a report, is in error, the problem shall be reported to the county election board, which shall determine if the reported problem warrants the county election board deeming the device unsatisfactory.(l) At the completion of testing under this section, the county election board, the representatives of the political parties and the candidates or the candidate's representatives who attended the test shall witness the resetting of each device that passed to a preelection state of readiness and the sealing of each device that passed in such a manner as to secure its state of readiness until the opening of the polls.20250HB0154PN0114 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (m) The county election board shall execute a written statement providing the tabulation devices tested, the results of the testing, the protective counter numbers, if applicable, of each tabulation device, the number of the seal securing each tabulation device at the conclusion of testing, any problems reported to the county election board as a result of the testing and whether each device tested is satisfactory or unsatisfactory. The written statement under this subsection shall be a public record under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the "Right-to-Know Law."(n) Any tabulating device deemed unsatisfactory shall be recoded, repaired or replaced and shall be made available for retesting. The device must be determined by the county election board to be satisfactory before the device may be used in an election. The county election board shall announce at the close of the first testing the date, place and time that an unsatisfactory device will be retested or may, at the option of the county election board, notify by telephone each individual who was present at the first testing as to the date, place and time that the retesting will occur.(o) Records shall be kept of all preelection testing of electronic or electromechanical tabulation devices used in an election. The records shall be present and available for inspection and reference during public preelection testing by any individual in attendance during the testing. The need of the county election board for access to the records during the testing shall take precedence over the need of other attendees to access such records so that the work of the county election board will not be delayed or hindered. Records of testing shall include, for each device, the name of each person who tested the 20250HB0154PN0114 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 device and the date, place, time and results of each test. Records of testing shall be retained as part of the official records of the election in which any device was used and shall be public records under the "Right-to-Know Law."(p) The county election board shall submit a copy of all records required under this section to the Department of the Auditor General.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0154PN0114 - 8 - 12345678